Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.430

Publication of distribution information, analyses results.

The department shall publish at least annually and in such form as it may deem proper (1) information concerning the distribution of commercial fertilizers and (2) results of analyses based on official samples as compared with the analyses guaranteed.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 31.]